Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.526

Childhood immunizations—Resources for expecting parents.

The department shall develop and make available resources for expecting parents regarding recommended childhood immunizations. The resources are intended to be provided to expecting parents by their health care providers to encourage discussion on childhood immunizations and postnatal care.

[ 2016 c 141 s 1.]